Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.207

Payments to spouse or ex spouse pursuant to court order.

(1) If the board of administration makes payments to a spouse or ex spouse to the extent expressly provided for in any court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to a court decree of dissolution or legal separation, it shall be a sufficient answer to any claim of a beneficiary against the board of administration or the retirement system for the board of administration to show that the payments were made pursuant to a court decree.

(2) All payments made to a nonmember spouse or ex spouse pursuant to RCW 41.28.205 shall cease upon the death of such a nonmember spouse or ex spouse. Upon such a death, the board of administration shall pay to the member his or her full monthly entitlement of benefits.

(3) The provisions of RCW 41.28.205 and this section shall apply to all court decrees of dissolution or legal separation and court-approved property settlement agreements, regardless of when entered, but shall apply only to those persons who have actually retired or who have requested withdrawal of any or all of their accumulated contributions: PROVIDED, That the board of administration shall not be responsible for making court-ordered divisions of withdrawals unless the order is filed with the board at least thirty days before the withdrawal payment date.

[ 1987 c 326 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 326: See RCW 41.50.901.

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits to spouse or ex spouse: RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.660.